Utah statutes.
78B-9-201.   Post-conviction remedies -- 30 days.
A post-conviction remedy may not be applied for or entertained by any court
within 30 days prior to the date set for execution of a capital sentence,
unless the grounds for application are based on facts or circumstances which
developed or first became known within that period of time.
